Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-805.01
Appropriations from state treasury; specific sums.

All appropriations of money from the state treasury, whether such money is derived from the levy of state taxes or from any other source, shall be by the appropriation of specific sums.

Laws 1921, c. 24, § 1, p. 150;

C.S.1922, § 6228;

C.S.1929, § 77-2617;

R.S.1943, § 77-2417;

Laws 1979, LB 194, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1986), § 77-2417;

Laws 1989, LB 13, § 2.